Louisiana, session 2026, HB118.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1899 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1899. Payment of claim; general damages
A. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "General damages" means subjective, nonpecuniary damages arising
from death, pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, worry, emotional
distress, loss of society and companionship, loss of consortium, bystander injury,
physical impairment, disfigurement, injury to reputation, humiliation,
embarrassment, loss of the enjoyment of life, hedonic damages, other nonpecuniary
damages, and any other theory of damages, including but not limited to fear of loss,
illness, or injury. The term "general damages" does not include punitive or
exemplary damages.
(2) "Special damages" means objectively verifiable pecuniary damages
arising from medical expenses and medical care, rehabilitation services, custodial
care, disabilities, loss of earnings and earning capacity, loss of income, burial costs,
loss of use of property, costs of repair or replacement of property, costs of obtaining
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-356 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 118
substitute domestic services, loss of employment, loss of business or employment
opportunities, and other objectively verifiable monetary losses.
B. In a suit for damages arising from a delictual action, the tortfeasor shall
not be required to pay an amount in excess of five million dollars for general
damages to any one claimant or plaintiff.
C. In a jury trial, the jury shall not be advised of the limitations imposed by
this Section, but the courts shall appropriately reduce any award of general damages
that exceed the applicable limitation.
D. The provisions of this Section shall not be construed as creating a cause
of action or as setting forth elements of or types of damages that are or are not
recoverable in any delictual action provided for in the Civil Code.